Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 856.3, as
last amended by Section 25 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1627 of the
2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, is amended to read as
follows:
Section 856.3. A. Any person who attempts or commits a gang-
related offense as a condition of membership in a criminal street
gang or while in association with any criminal street gang or gang
member shall be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense punishable upon
conviction by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term of five (5) years, which shall be in addition
to any other penalty imposed. For purposes of this section
subsection, “criminal street gang” is defined by subsection F of
Section 856 of this title and “gang-related offense” means those
offenses enumerated in subsection F of Section 856 of this title.

B. Any person who attempts or commits a gang-related offense as
a condition of membership of, while in association with, acting on
behalf of, or knowingly supporting any foreign terrorist
organization shall be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense punishable
upon conviction by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term of five (5) years, which shall be in addition
to any other penalty imposed. For purposes of this subsection,
“foreign terrorist organization” means any organization designated
by the United States Department of State as such pursuant to 8
U.S.C., Section 1189. The court may take judicial notice of such
designation as published in the Federal Register or maintained by
the United States Department of State.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3764 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3764 Page 3